Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GREATER MINNEAPOLIS COUNCIL OF CHURCHES DROP-IN SUPPORT SERVICES.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for a grant to Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches to provide drop-in support services. Grant funds must be used to provide: new text end new text begin (1) hot, prepared meals and takeaway food bags that increase access to nutritious, healthy, and culturally appropriate food; new text end new text begin (2) hygiene supplies, including towels and washcloths, toothpaste and toothbrushes, shampoo and soap, menstrual products, and clean clothes and undergarments; new text end new text begin (3) hats, gloves, hand warmers, and blankets; and new text end new text begin (4) access to resources for housing, employment, and social services. new text end